pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Higiena osobista > Golenie i strzyżenie > Usuwanie włosów: Depilatory; Akcesoria i materiały eksploatacyjne do elektrolizy; Urządzenia do depilacji metodą elektrolizy; Epilatory; Podgrzewacze do wosku do depilacji; Urządzenia do depilacji laserowej i IPL; Akcesoria do podgrzewaczy wosku; Zestawy do depilacji woskiem
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados pessoais > Barbearia e embelezamento > Depilação: Cremes depilatórios; Acessórios e consumíveis de eletrólise; Aparelhos de eletrólise; Depiladores; Aquecedores de cera para depilação; Aparelhos para remoção de pelos a laser; Acessórios para aquecedor de cera; Kits e suprimentos para depilação com cera
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Kişisel Bakım > Tıraş ve Kişisel Bakım > Tüy Alma: Tüy Dökücü Kremler; Elektroliz Aksesuarları ve Sarf Malzemeleri; Elektroliz Cihazları; Epilatörler; Ağda Isıtıcılar; Lazer ve IPL Epilasyon Cihazları; Ağda Isıtıcısı Aksesuarları; Ağda Setleri ve Malzemeleri
fr: Santé et beauté > Hygiène personnelle > Rasage et soins > Épilation: Crèmes dépilatoires; Accessoires et consommables pour électrolyse; Appareils à électrolyse; Épilateurs; Chauffe-cire; Épilateurs laser et à la lumière pulsée; Accessoires pour chauffe-cire; Kits et accessoires d’épilation à la cire
en: Health & Beauty > Personal Care > Shaving & Grooming > Hair Removal: Depilatories; Electrolysis Accessories & Consumables; Electrolysis Devices; Epilators; Hair Removal Wax Warmers; Laser & IPL Hair Removal Devices; Wax Warmer Accessories; Waxing Kits & Supplies
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Persoonlijke verzorging > Scheren en gezichtsbeharing > Ontharing: Ontharingsproducten; Elektrolyse accessoires en verbruiksartikelen; Elektrolyseapparaten; Epileerapparaten; Warmers voor ontharingswas; Laser- en IPL-ontharingsapparaten; Wax verwarmer accessoires; Harssets en -benodigdheden
it: Salute e bellezza > Cura della persona > Insaponatura e rasatura > Depilazione: Depilatori; Accessori e materiali consumibili dell'elettrolisi; Dispositivi per elettrolisi; Epilatori; Scaldacera per depilazione; Dispositivi per la depilazione laser e a luce pulsata; Accessori dello scaldacera; Prodotti e kit per depilazione con cera
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 個人保養 > 刮鬍修容 > 除毛用品: 除毛膏; 電解除毛配件及耗材; 電燒除毛裝置; 電動除毛刀; 蜜蠟除毛機; 雷射除毛裝置; 熱蠟機配件; 蜜蠟除毛用品/工具組
cs: Zdraví a krása > Osobní péče > Holení a péče o vzhled > Odstraňování chloupků: Depilátory; Příslušenství a spotřební materiál pro elektrolýzu; Elektrolytická zařízení; Epilátory; Ohřívače depilačního vosku; Depilační lasery a IPL; Příslušenství k ohřívačům vosku; Voskové depilační sady a materiály
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijire personală > Bărbierit și îngrijire > Îndepărtarea părului: Aparate de epilat; Consumabile și accesorii pentru electroliză; Dispozitive de electroliză; Epilatoare; Încălzitoare de ceară pentru epilat; Dispozitive de îndepărtare a părului cu laser și IPL; Accesorii pentru încălzitoare de ceară; Truse și consumabile pentru epilat cu ceară
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Лична грижа > Бръснене и подстригване > Обезкосмяване: Депилатоари; Аксесоари и консумативи за електролиза; Уреди за електролиза; Епилатори; Нагреватели за кола маска; Лазерни и IPL устройства за епилация; Аксесоари за нагревател на коламаска; Комплекти и консумативи за кола маска
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidado pessoal > Depilação e barbear > Remoção de pelo: Depilatórios; Acessórios e consumíveis para eletrólise; Dispositivos de eletrólise; Depiladoras; Aquecedores de cera para depilação; Dispositivos de depilação a laser e IPL; Acessórios para aquecedores de cera; Artigos e kits de remoção com cera
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Personlig pleje > Barbering og personlig pleje > Hårfjerning: Depilatorer; Elektrolyse-tilbehør og forbrugsvarer; Elektrolyseenheder; Epilatorer; Opvarmning af hårfjerningsvoks; IPL- og laserapparater til hårfjerning; Voksopvarmer – tilbehør; Vokssæt
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Personlig vård > Rakning och ansning > Hårborttagning: Hårborttagningsmedel; Tillbehör och förbrukningsvaror för elektrolys; Elektrolysenheter; Epilatorer; Värmeapparater för hårborttagningsvax; Laser- och IPL-apparater för hårborttagning; Tillbehör till vaxvärmare; Vaxningspaket
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Körperpflege > Rasieren & Trimmen > Haarentfernung: Enthaarungsmittel; Elektrolyse-Zubehör & Verbrauchsmaterialien; Elektrolysegeräte; Epilatoren; Enthaarungswachs-Wärmer; Laser- & IPL-Haarentfernung; Wachswärmer-Zubehör; Waxing-Sets & Zubehör
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Osebna nega > Britje in urejanje > Odstranjevanje dlak: Depilatorji; Dodatki in potrošni material za elektrolizo; Naprave za elektrolizo; Epilatorji; Grelci za vosek za odstranjevanje dlak; Naprave za odstranjevanje dlačic z laserjem in IPL tehnologijo; Dodatki za grelce voska; Kompleti in pripomočki za depilacijo
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Προσωπική φροντίδα > Ξύρισμα & περιποίηση > Αποτρίχωση: Αποτριχωτικά προϊόντα; Αναλώσιμα ηλεκτρόλυσης; Συσκευές ηλεκτρόλυσης; Αποτριχωτικές συσκευές; Θερμαντήρες κεριών αποτρίχωσης; Συσκευές αποτρίχωσης Laser & IPL; Αξεσουάρ θερμάστρας κεριού; Κιτ και προμήθειες αποτρίχωσης
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Osobna njega > Brijanje i uređivanje > Uklanjanje dlaka: Sredstva za depilaciju; Potrošni materijali i dodaci za elektrolizu; Uređaji za elektrolizu; Epilatori; Grijači voska za uklanjanje dlačica; Uređaji za lasersko i IPL uklanjanje dlačica; Dodatna oprema za grijače voska; Kompleti i pribor za depilaciju voskom
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Asmeninė priežiūra > Skutimasis ir barzdos bei ūsų priežiūra > Plaukų šalinimas: Depiliatoriai; Elektrolizės priedai ir eksploatacinės medžiagos; Elektrolizės prietaisai; Epiliatoriai; Depiliacinio vaško šildytuvai; Lazeriniai ir IPL plaukų šalinimo prietaisai; Vaško šildytuvo priedai; Vaškavimo rinkiniai ir reikmenys
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Henkilökohtainen hygienia > Karvanpoisto ja parranajo > Karvanpoisto: Ihokarvojen poistovalmisteet; Elektrolyysin lisävaruste ja kulutusmateriaali; Elektrolyysiä hyödyntävät laitteet; Epilaattorit; Karvanpoistovahan lämmittimet; Laser- ja IPL-karvanpoistolaitteet; Vahanlämmittimen lisävaruste; Vahauspakkaukset ja -tarvikkeet
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 个人护理 > 剃须/美容 > 脱毛: 脱毛膏; 电解脱毛配件和耗材; 电解脱毛装置; 脱毛器; 脱毛蜡加热器; 激光/IPL 脱毛设备; 蜡加热器配件; 上蜡工具包
ru: Красота и здоровье > Личная гигиена и уход за собой > Бритье и удаление волос > Удаление волос: Кремы для депиляции; Аксессуары и расходные материалы для электролиза; Устройства для электроэпиляции; Эпиляторы; Воскоплавы; Устройства для фотоэпиляции и лазерной эпиляции; Аксессуары для воскоплавов; Наборы для восковой эпиляции
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Personlig pleie > Barbering og kroppspleie > Hårfjerning: Hårfjerningsmidler; Elektrolyse-tilbehør og -forbruksvarer; Elektrolyseapparater; Epilatorer; Voksvarmere for hårfjerning; Laser- og IPL-baserte hårfjerningsapparater; Voksvarmer-tilbehør; Vokssett og -produkter
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลส่วนบุคคล > การโกนหนวดและการเสริมสวย > ที่ถอนขน: น้ำยากำจัดขน; อุปกรณ์และวัสดุสิ้นเปลืองกำจัดขนถาวร; เครื่องกำจัดขนไฟฟ้า; เครื่องถอนขน; เครื่องอุ่นแวกซ์กำจัดขน; อุปกรณ์ถอนขนแบบเลเซอร์และ IPL; อุปกรณ์เสริมเครื่องอุ่นแว็กซ์; ชุดและอุปกรณ์แวกซ์
ko: 건강/미용 > 개인 미용/위생 용품 > 면도/체모 손질 > 제모 용품: 제모제; 전기 분해 액세서리 및 소모품; 전기분해 제모기; 제모기; 제모 왁스 워머; 레이저/IPL 제모기; 왁스 워머 액세서리; 왁싱 키트/용품
ja: 美容・健康 > 衛生日用品 > シェービング・脱毛 > 脱毛: 脱毛剤; 電気分解脱毛アクセサリーと消耗品; 高周波脱毛器; 電気脱毛器; 脱毛ワックスウォーマー; レーザー・光脱毛器; ワックスウォーマーアクセサリー; 脱毛ワックス用品
hu: Egészség és szépség > Személyes gondoskodás > Borotválkozás és ápolás > Szőrtelenítés: Szőrtelenítők; Elektrolízis-kiegészítők és fogyóeszközök; Elektrolízis-készülékek; Epilátorok; Szőrtelenítő gyantamelegítők; Lézeres és IPL szőrtelenítő eszközök; Viaszmelegítő kiegészítők; Gyantázási készletek és kellékek
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Sản phẩm chăm sóc cá nhân > Chăm sóc ngoại hình > Tẩy lông: Thuốc tẩy lông; Phụ kiện và vật tư triệt lông điện; Thiết bị điện phân; Máy tẩy lông; Máy tẩy lông tóc; Máy triệt lông bằng laser và IPL; Phụ kiện nồi đun sáp; Bộ phụ kiện và phụ liệu tẩy lông
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Osobná starostlivosť > Pomôcky na holenie a zastrihávanie brady a fúzov > Epilácia: Depilátory; Príslušenstvo a spotrebný materiál pre elektrolýzu; Zariadenia na elektrolýzu; Epilátory; Epilačné ohrievače vosku; Laserové a IPL epilátory; Príslušenstvo na ohrievače vosku; Epilačné súpravy a potreby
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado personal > Afeitado y arreglo personal > Depilación: Productos depilatorios; Accesorios y consumibles de electrólisis; Aparatos para la depilación por electrólisis; Depiladoras; Calentadores de cera para depilación; Aparatos de depilación láser e IPL; Accesorios de calentador de cera; Kits y suministros de cera